src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IV_VUÄGˈGAD !!= * @CODE@ vuägˈgad:vuägˈg
+V+IV: V0_VUÄGˈGAD ;
LEXICON TV_VUÄGˈGAD !!= * @CODE@ vuägˈgad:vuägˈg
+V+TV: V0_VUÄGˈGAD ;
LEXICON V0_VUÄGˈGAD !!= * @CODE@ vuägˈgad:vuägˈg

! ** Yaml: __V-vuaeggad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! vuägˈgad:vuägˈg
! Stem is extra strong
! diphthong
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: vuägˈgad
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuägˈg
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuägˈga
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ciâgˈgu
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: vuägˈg
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: vuägˈgaž
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuägˈgas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuågˈgu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vuägˈgaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: ceäg»
!
: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !4
:%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%^CCC2CC%>až   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^CCC2CC%>as K ; !7
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ;
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^CCC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


LEXICON V_LÄULLAD !!= * @CODE@ läullad:läull
+V: V0_LÄULLAD ;
LEXICON IV_LÄULLAD !!= * @CODE@ läullad:läull
+V+IV: V0_LÄULLAD ;
LEXICON TV_LÄULLAD !!= * @CODE@ läullad:läull
+V+TV: V0_LÄULLAD ;
LEXICON V0_LÄULLAD !!= * @CODE@ läullad:läull

! ** Yaml: __V-laullad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! läullad:läull
! Gradation
! monophthong followed by consonant cluster
! Stem is strong
! FORMS
! (1) +Inf: läullad
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: läull
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läulla
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laullu
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: lääul
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: lääulež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääulas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laullu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läullaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: läul»

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
: VSUF-INF_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: läullad
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc 
!! +Der/mõš

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: läull
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läulla
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laullu
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-No-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) lääul
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-StableVowel-No-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: lääulež
!:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; = * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: lääulež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LowVowel-No-palatalization
!:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; = * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääulas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laullu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läullaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: läul»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_SÄRNNAD !!= * @CODE@ särnnad:särnn
+V: V0_SÄRNNAD ;
LEXICON IV_SÄRNNAD !!= * @CODE@ särnnad:särnn
+V+IV: V0_SÄRNNAD ;
LEXICON TV_SÄRNNAD !!= * @CODE@ särnnad:särnn
+V+TV: V0_SÄRNNAD ;
LEXICON V0_SÄRNNAD !!= * @CODE@ särnnad:särnn

! ** Yaml: __V-särnnad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! särnnad:särnn
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: särnnad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: särnn
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: särnna
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: sarnnu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: säärn
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: säärnež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: säärnas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: sarnnu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: särnnaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: särnn»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: särnnad
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Ind+Prt+ConNeg
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc, +Der/mõš

: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: särnn
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: särnna
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: sarnnu
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4


:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-7) +Imprt+Sg2: säärn
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2
!! +Ger, +VAbess, +Pot, +Cond, +Imprt+Sg3

:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 sarnnu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) särnnaz
!! +Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: särn»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


LEXICON V_KÄIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ käiddad:käidd
+V: V0_KÄIDDAD ;
LEXICON IV_KÄIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ käiddad:käidd
+V+IV: V0_KÄIDDAD ;
LEXICON TV_KÄIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ käiddad:käidd
+V+TV: V0_KÄIDDAD ;
LEXICON V0_KÄIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ käiddad:käidd

! ** Yaml: __V-käiddad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! käiddad:käidd
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: käiddad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: käidd
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: käidda
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kaiddu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: kääid
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kääidež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: kääidas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kaiddu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: käiddaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: käidd»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 käiddad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 käidd
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 käidda
:%^VOWRaise%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !4 kaiddu
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 kääid-
+Pot+Sg3:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>ež	K ; !6 kääidež
+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7 kääidas
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 kaiddu
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; ! käidd-
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_KUÄIVVAD !!= * @CODE@ kuäivvad:kuäivv
+V: V0_KUÄIVVAD ;
LEXICON IV_KUÄIVVAD !!= * @CODE@ kuäivvad:kuäivv
+V+IV: V0_KUÄIVVAD ;
LEXICON TV_KUÄIVVAD !!= * @CODE@ kuäivvad:kuäivv
+V+TV: V0_KUÄIVVAD ;
LEXICON V0_KUÄIVVAD !!= * @CODE@ kuäivvad:kuäivv

! ** Yaml: __V-kuaeivvad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! kuäivvad:kuäivv
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: kuäivvad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kuäivv
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kuäivva
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuaivvu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: kuäiv
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kuäivež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: kuäivas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kuaivvu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kuäivvaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: kuäivv»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 kuäivvad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 kuäivv
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 kuäivva
:%^VOWRaise%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !4 kuaivvu
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 kuäiv-
+Pot+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>ež	K ; !6 kuäivež
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7 kuäivas
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 kuaivvu
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; ! kuäivv-
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_KUÄSTTAD !!= * @CODE@ kuästtad:kuästt
+V: V0_KUÄSTTAD ;
LEXICON IV_KUÄSTTAD !!= * @CODE@ kuästtad:kuästt
+V+IV: V0_KUÄSTTAD ;
LEXICON TV_KUÄSTTAD !!= * @CODE@ kuästtad:kuästt
+V+TV: V0_KUÄSTTAD ;
