src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
certtad:certt V_SÄRNNAD ;
cuälkkad:cuälkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
huälttad:huältt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
hälbbad:hälbb V_SÄRNNAD ;
häʹrvvad:häʹrvv V_LÄULLAD ;
håiddad:håidd V_LÄULLAD ;
jeärmmad:jeärmm V_KUÄSTTAD ;
juârbbad:juârbb V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kruäŋkkad:kruäŋkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kuâlddad:kuâldd V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kuäivvad:kuäivv V_KUÄIVVAD ;
kuärjjad:kuärjj V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kuärŋŋad:kuärŋŋ V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kuästtad:kuästt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
kuäškkad:kuäškk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
käiddad:käidd V_LÄULLAD ;
käinnad:käinn V_LÄULLAD ;
käʹrǯǯad:käʹrǯǯ V_LÄULLAD ;
kåbllad:kåbll V_SÄRNNAD ;
kåikkad:kåikk V_LÄULLAD ;
ledmmad:ledmm V_SÄRNNAD ;
lemjjad:lemjj V_SÄRNNAD ;
leäškkad:leäškk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
lâsmmad:lâsmm V_SÄRNNAD ;
lâuʹŋŋad:lâuʹŋŋ V_LÄULLAD ;
läittad:läitt V_LÄULLAD ;
läivvad:läivv V_LÄULLAD ;
läukkad:läukk V_LÄULLAD ;
läullad:läull V_LÄULLAD ;
läškkad:läškk V_SÄRNNAD ;
låuddad:låudd V_LÄULLAD ;
meârkkad:meârkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
meälttad:meältt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
mårššad:måršš V_SÄRNNAD ;
neälggad:neälgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
njeärttad:njeärtt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
njorggad:njorgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
njuâckkad:njuâckk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
njuârggad:njuârgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
njuäckad:njuäck V_LÄULLAD ;
njuäckkad:njuäckk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
njäukkad:njäukk V_LÄULLAD ;
norddad:nordd V_SÄRNNAD ;
noskkad:noskk V_SÄRNNAD ;
nuâskkad:nuâskk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
nuätkkad:nuätkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
näuddad:näudd V_LÄULLAD ;
näuʹddad:näuʹdd V_LÄULLAD ;
nåiddad:nåidd V_LÄULLAD ;
orvvad:orvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
pelkkad:pelkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
proŋkkad:proŋkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
puâckkad:puâckk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
puätkkad:puätkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
puåimmad:puåimm V_LÄULLAD ;
pâurrad:pâurr V_LÄULLAD ;
päinnad:päinn V_LÄULLAD ;
pälvvad:pälvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
päčkkad:päčkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
päʹrddad:päʹrdd V_LÄULLAD ;
pådggad:pådgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
påhssad:påhss V_SÄRNNAD ;
pårggad:pårgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
repssad:repss V_SÄRNNAD ;
repččad:repčč V_SÄRNNAD ;
reâuggad:reâugg V_KUÄIVVAD ;
reäbǯǯad:reäbǯǯ V_KUÄSTTAD ;
reäčkkad:reäčkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
reäŋggad:reäŋgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
reäŋkkad:reäŋkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
reäʹbccad:reäʹbcc V_LÄULLAD ;
räiggad:räigg V_LÄULLAD ;
seäpttad:seäptt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
snodggad:snodgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
sorččad:sorččad V_SÄRNNAD ;
stäullad:stäull V_LÄULLAD ;
svâlččad:svâlčč V_SÄRNNAD ;
sähssad:sähss V_SÄRNNAD ;
sälbbad:sälbb V_SÄRNNAD ;
sälvvad:sälvvad V_SÄRNNAD ;
särggad:särgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
särnnad:särnn V_SÄRNNAD ;
säurrad:säurr V_LÄULLAD ;
säʹrddad:säʹrdd V_SÄRNNAD ;
sõrččad:sõrččad V_SÄRNNAD ;
telččad:telčč V_SÄRNNAD ;
terškkad:terškk V_SÄRNNAD ;
terššad:teršš V_SÄRNNAD ;
teskkad:teskk V_SÄRNNAD ;
teâlkkad:teâlkk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
teälccad:teälcc V_KUÄSTTAD ;
teäppčad:teäppč V_LÄULLAD ;
teäpččad:teäpčč V_KUÄSTTAD ;
tolppad:tolpp V_SÄRNNAD ;
tolvvad:tolvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
topččad:topčč V_SÄRNNAD ;
torccad:torcc V_SÄRNNAD ;
torššad:toršš V_SÄRNNAD ;
tuârbbad:tuârbb V_KUÄSTTAD ;
tuâsttad:tuâstt V_KUÄSTTAD ;
tuäivvad:tuäivv V_KUÄIVVAD ;
tuåimmad:tuåimm V_LÄULLAD ;
tuårggad:tuårgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
tuårggad:tuårgg V_LÄULLAD ;
tälkkad:tälkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
tälvvad:tälvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
tåiddad:tåiddad V_LÄULLAD ;
tålccad:tålcc V_SÄRNNAD ;
tårmmad:tårmm V_SÄRNNAD ;
veâhssad:veâhss V_KUÄSTTAD ;
veâullad:veâull V_KUÄIVVAD ;
veälččad:veälčč V_KUÄSTTAD ;
veäʹlččad:veäʹlčč V_LÄULLAD ;
vuâpssad:vuâpss V_KUÄSTTAD ;
vuârbbad:vuârbb V_KUÄSTTAD ;
vuârnnad:vuârnn V_KUÄSTTAD ;
västtad:västt V_SÄRNNAD ;
vätkkad:vätkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
väčkkad:väčkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
äiddad:äidd V_LÄULLAD ;
äiggad:äigg V_LÄULLAD ;
äinnad:äinn V_LÄULLAD ;
ärddad:ärdd V_SÄRNNAD ;
ärggad:ärgg V_SÄRNNAD ;
åiggad:åigg V_LÄULLAD ;
åimmad:åimm V_LÄULLAD ;
ålvvad:ålvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
årnnad:årnn V_SÄRNNAD ;
åskkad:åskk V_SÄRNNAD ;
åuvvad:åuvv V_LÄULLAD ;
čeärggad:čeärgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
čuârbbad:čuârbb V_KUÄSTTAD ;
čuârvvad:čuârvv V_KUÄSTTAD ;
čuäckkad:čuäckk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
čärnnad:čärnn V_SÄRNNAD ;
čärvvad:čärvv V_SÄRNNAD ;
čäʹrnnad:čäʹrnn V_SÄRNNAD ;
čårnnad:čårnn V_SÄRNNAD ;
čåujjad:čåujj V_LÄULLAD ;
šeälggad:šeälgg V_KUÄSTTAD ;
škornnad:škornn V_SÄRNNAD ;
šnårkkad:šnårkk V_SÄRNNAD ;
šärbbad:šärbb V_SÄRNNAD ;
ǩeâittad:ǩeâitt V_KUÄIVVAD ;
ǩeârnnad:ǩeârnn V_KUÄSTTAD ;
ǩeâškkad:ǩeâškk V_KUÄSTTAD ;
ǩeähnnad:ǩeähnn V_KUÄSTTAD ;
ǩeärnnad:ǩeärnn V_KUÄSTTAD ;
ǩeärččad:ǩeärčč V_KUÄSTTAD ;
